











































Distributed social proof insurance

Insurance of blockchain business transactions, vehicles, 
property, life and health with endorsements from your 
trusted social network.

If your friends trust you,
we trust you. 

Token sale

Be aware that ICOs are extremely risky and highly speculative investments. 
Never invest money that you can’t afford to lose. Make sure you read and 
understand the Whitepaper and Terms & Conditions.

InsurePal itself is not a licensed insurance provider.  Any insurance activity will be done in cooperation 
with the licensed insurer on local markets. The company is building a global blockchain-based platform, 
enabling social proofing to be conducted in numerous ways across different industries.



Distributed social proof insurance2

TO OUR FELLOW SUPPORTERS

We strongly believe that decentralized trust will unlock a decentralized future. We are en-
tering the next phase of the internet with many blockchains reshaping traditional economic 
models to become largely self-regulating. Thus, the need for a centralized institution is be-
coming redundant. In this aspect, InsurePal challenges the insurance industry of today with a 
decentralized, self-regulating social proof insurance platform with perhaps the most innova-
tive model of risk selection. 

Today, every segment of insurance is ultra-competitive with entrepreneurs exploring new 
ways to price risk, creating new types of premiums and servicing consumers in a tightly reg-
ulated and challenging economy. Competitive advantage revolves around the ability to adapt 
in an ever-changing environment and demanding customer expectations. With more than 
15 years of experience in insurance, we have had the opportunity to witness, explore and 
thoroughly question the current business model. We have learned by doing. Realising that 
regardless of restrictions and rigorous supervision, insurance fails to provide a transparent 
and fair pricing model with good risks subsidizing poor risks. 

Over the last two years, our team has tested and refined the opportunity behind the Insure-
Pal platform by taking into account both, our own experience from processing huge amount 
of policies and claims and the advice from underwriting specialists. The thing that makes 
InsurePal fundamentally different is the complete switch in paradigm. Rather than insurance 
companies accommodating irresponsible clients and having expensive administration, we 
are growing a community of more responsible and diligent individuals who share a common 
value of reciprocity. Our agile, self-regulating insurance platform will help them connect and 
conclude mutual insurance, consequently making sure they stop paying for irresponsible in-
dividuals. 

InsurePal is motivated by a psychological phenomenon known as “social proof” which is a nat-
ural, in-built mechanism within all of us, representing people’s moral compass. The process 
will leave little or no room for fraud and recklessness as InsurePal is set to reward, motivate 
and grow behavioral patterns that not only benefit oneself, but stimulate groups and society 
as a whole. We think of blockchain as an ideal architecture for our innovation. Its implemen-
tation has a long-term horizon to fundamentally simplify the business processes as we know 
today and build a highly customer-centric product that is designed for the benefit of each 
individual and not for the profits of the insurance companies. Blockchain technology makes 
it possible to get rid of all redundant articles in a transparent way and support a growth of 
peer-to-peer self-regulating community, thus committing InsurePal to delivering the cheapest 
affordable insurance to responsible and diligent individuals. 

In addition to innovations in the already known segments of insurance (motor, life & health, 
property), InsurePal also intervenes in the completely new area, namely, securing blockchain 
business transactions. By ensuring the financial compensation of an unrealized deal to the 
injured party we will establish the trust among all the stakeholders and greatly accelerate 
the quality and quantity of all future blockchain business transactions. Considering all of this, 
we believe now is the best time for a new insurance player to further investigate blockchain 
and offer a revolutionizing solution on InsurePal platform that will fully harness the innova-
tive power of blockchain technology. InsurePal is nearing our ambitious goal and coming to 
life. By introducing the first social proof insurance on blockchain we are ready to disrupt the 
insurance market worth $7 trillion globally. We invite you to join us in a venture in what is to 
become a new insurance model of the next generation. 

Sincerely,

Matt Peterman   Tom Volk

InsurePal itself is not a 
licensed insurance provider.  
Any insurance activity will 
be done in cooperation 
with the licensed insurer 
on local markets. The 
company is building a global 
blockchain-based platform, 
enabling social proofing to be 
conducted in numerous ways 
across different industries.



Opportunity



Distributed social proof insurance4

PROJECT OVERVIEW

InsurePal is a self-regulating, social proof insurance platform based on social proofing 
and decentralization. To protect the intellectual property behind InsurePal, a worldwide 
patent has been filed, giving then InsurePal platform a unique opportunity to become 
“the go to” platform for insurance based on social-proof. 

The introduction of social proof as a self-regulating psychological phenomenon allows 
InsurePal to nurture a scheme of lower-risk individuals, consequently decreasing their 
premiums by up to 50%, whilst fully harnessing the power of blockchain technology. Hav-
ing the ability to offer an attractive end-to-end product for an incomparably lower price 
is our guarantee for success, as well as a proven solution that will attract only the diligent 
and responsible into our business model. 

Every day, the blockchain wave is gathering strength. With more and more concrete ini-
tiatives, either alone or in association with their peers, business partners, clients or sup-
pliers, it gives foundations to a birth of a booming new economy in the years to come. 
The new golden era will begin as soon as the trust between parties doing business on 
blockchain is established on an adequate level. 

InsurePal model improves the segmentation and risk selection process; a decades-last-
ing issue for insurance companies and insurance clients alike and most importantly, en-
hances the trust that flows horizontally among peers, friends, colleagues and business 
partners. The most suitable expression for InsurePal using insurance terminology would 
be “a third-party deductible”. It is proven that a classic deductible reduces insurance 
claims frequency due to the clients’ imposed self-evaluation. From this fact InsurePal 
proceeded when re-inventing an InsurePal third-party deductible into a third-party eval-
uation with introducing social proof. By doing so, InsurePal managed to objectivize the 
evaluation process itself.

To customers, the key motivator to use InsurePal is a significant cost reduction. Namely, 
the core mechanism behind the platform enables InsurePal clients to endorse each oth-
er in order to obtain a discount on their insurance premium. The endorsement has to be 
backed by a financial guarantee from the endorser which is only taken in case the insurer 
files an at fault claim. The InsurePal platform enables the social proof of an individual to 
be locked into the blockchain in order to secure higher transparency without aggressive-
ly invading privacy. Due to this innovative approach, InsurePal will expand peer-to-peer 
risk managed operations and become the customer’s first choice, consequently making 
it available in a wide range of different types of insurance products. 

“A patented solution gives InsurePal an unique competitive advantage. All the third-par-
ties that would want to adopt the social proof methodology will be obliged to use Insure-
Pal platform solution, as any other form of use can be considered an infringement.“

“InsurePal will replace the insurers’ model as we know it today, and at the same time 
offer a completely new type of coverage for areas of life and business that began to 
emerge with the evolution of blockchain and the transactions being carried out on the 
distributed ledger “



Distributed social proof insurance5

Moreover, with a module for blockchain-made agreements, InsurePal will assure a final 
compensation to the insured client in case the other party breaches the mutually set 
arrangement, namely when the agreed service is not performed within the set dead-
line, quality and other conditions stated in the smart contract. It too will use the basic 
principle of social proof, meaning that the compensation will partly be covered by the in-
surance company and partly by the endorsers, putting social pressure on all the signing 
parties and quickly eliminating those that violate the terms. The embedded seriousness 
of such an agreement will guarantee the transactions between the parties are being 
carried out with the utmost responsibility. Significantly better segmentation and incen-
tives to change behavior guarantee a marked reduction in insurance premiums, leading 
to the insurance to become widely acceptable for the majority of blockchain business 
transactions. 

The growing value of InsurePal social proof insurance will reflect in the increasing mar-
ket value of InsurePal (hereinafter IPL) tokens. The adaptation of InsurePal policies will 
trigger a wider circulation and utilisation of the IPL token, with the aim to become the 
prevailing currency of global social proof insurance economy. It is our belief that other 
segments of the fiat economy, closely linked to the insurance industry, will consequently 
start accepting IPL tokens as a currency, serving as an additional boost of an IPL utility 
token economy.

The total amount of issued IPL tokens will be limited and fixed, with a security mecha-
nism of token split and/or token denomination added to efficiently support expected 
price growth in the future. We are cognizant that the adoption of the tokens by the mass 
markets is an evolutionary process, therefore InsurePal will gradually progress to a fully 
tokenized operation. It is our goal that the IPL utility token becomes the currency of the 
InsurePal community that will operate as an alternative economy based on a patented 
social-proof business model. As such, it will noticeably disrupt the $7 trillion worldwide 
insurance industry of today and significantly improve the blockchain business transac-
tions of tomorrow. 

For that, we invite you to get fully acquainted with social proof as the core mechanism 
behind our business model and learn more about the InsurePal token utilization. We are 
firmly convinced of the scalability and potential for it to become a first-of-a-kind social 
proof insurance platform with a global ambition. 



Distributed social proof insurance6

MISSION STATEMENT

InsurePal aims to become a first-of-a-kind blockchain-based decentralised insurance 
platform powered by social proof guarantee. We’re dedicated to build a modern insur-
ance product that reflects the historical roots of insurance, where a smaller group of 
acquaintances agreed on a mutual method of sharing the burden of risk based on trust. 
We wish to return insurance back to its core value of trust and consequently expand 
the mindset of mutual reciprocity. As InsurePal model is self-regulating and therefore 
ideal for blockchain implementation, we’re decided to not only address the insurance 
challenges of today, but encroach upon those niche segments which don’t yet exist but 
will be crucial in the years to come. Doing so, we tend to deepen the community’s con-
fidence in blockchain transactions and operations, and thus strengthening the growth 
and expansion of an emerging distributed economy. 

VISION 

Our vision is to craft an insurance premium based on one’s social endorsements by 
rewarding diligence. We’re growing a community that shares the common value of rec-
iprocity and thus creating a shift, not just in insurance industry, but also in a broader 
society. InsurePal can and will self-regulate without the need of an industry-funded regu-
latory body, continuously allowing us to create attractive end-to-end insurance solutions, 
addressing both, the challenges of today and those of tomorrow.

John is a responsible, diligent driver who hasn’t had an accident in years. But, the price of John`s insurance is $1000 per year. He feels bad for overpaying for 
his mandatory car insurance. He finds out about InsurePal insurance, which offers him an upfront saving of $400 on his car insurance. Everything he needs to 
do is to find an endorser who will guarantee for his good driving record. He immediately thinks of his friend Mary and sends her an invite, whilst also explaining 
her the idea behind the new insurance. Mary guarantees for John with a credit card and immediately receives an upfront reward $100 worth of IPL tokens. 
This token transaction also contains the social proof information. When Mary enters her credit card data, she exposes herself to a potential payment of $550 
($400 of John’s savings, $100 of her cash-back bonus and $50 of penalties). It is important to note that Mary’s credit card will only be charged in case John 
files an at fault claim within the next year. In other words, if there is no claim, John paid only $600 for his insurance and Mary got $100 of IPL tokens, which 
she can sell on an exchange and spend or keep as an investment. John can find more endorser to further reduce his insurance price and at the same time 
promote InsurePal, helping the product to grow virally. And because John understands the benefits of InsurePal, he will also be willing to endorse Mary who 
is safe driver as well, when her car insurance policy will be due.

John is a safe driver
He pays $1000/year for car insurance

InsurePal
I can save $400
with

John asks his friend 
Mary to endorse him and 

help him lower his 

premium via InsurePal 

INSUREPAL FOR MOTOR CAR INDUSTRY

USER CASE 1

InsurePal itself is not a 
licensed insurance provider.  
Any insurance activity will 
be done in cooperation 
with the licensed insurer 
on local markets. The 
company is building a global 
blockchain-based platform, 
enabling social proofing to be 
conducted in numerous ways 
across different industries.



Distributed social proof insurance7

In the case above, InsurePal provides insurance coverage to Andrew making business transaction with Susan. If their contract is breached, InsurePal pays the 
penalty to John partly from InsurePal insurance pool and partly by collecting deductibles from his endorsers. Due to their direct engagement with Andrew, 
his friends Emma, Ann and Frank (nodes 1, 2, 3 and 4 respectively) pay more, whereas the others (nodes from 5 to 8 and up) pay less, accordingly. The data 
of their transactions is also collected in order to calculate Social Proof Trustscore of each (directly and indirectly) participating endorser. Their exposure and 
the collection of the deductibles is governed by the InsurePal algorithm. The process can be compared to the co-signing loans with one major difference: 
InsurePal model allows that all the endorsers (co-signers) receive a financial incentive. It is expected that due to their mutual social pressure the InsurePal 
community in whole will behave more diligently, and hence the insurance premiums will be low enough to not cause any friction on the executing transactions.
Our model is applicable anywhere in the world due the imposed element of trust among the insurers and the endorsers. As such, it can easily penetrate into 
the countries where insurance is extremely costly or into those where it doesn’t exist at all, with the assumption that diligent subgroups may appear anywhere.

Andrew and Susan want to make a business transaction, 
but don't completely trust each other.

They sign a smart contract defining breaching penalty, 
arbitrage body and arrangement’s due date and insure 

their business transaction with InsurePal.

ARBITRAGE

If their business arrangement doesn't 
happen in due time and leads to a more 
challenging dispute, they begin with an 

arbitrage.

The arbitrage determines who 
breached the contract and sets the 
amount of penalties for InsurePal to 

cover.

The compensation is paid even if 
Susan's or Andrew's identity remains 

anonymous or is false.

Andrew and Susan share the same interests, but live on the other side of the world. They want to make a business transaction to exchange goods, but don’t 
know and trust each other well enough. InsurePal blockchain business transactions module allows them to craft an upfront agreement in which they specify 
important terms and conditions of their transaction. They both have to agree upon a maximum penalty for contract breaching and define a due date after 
which the appeal  between the parties is no longer possible. In case of dispute, the parties first try to settle it among themselves and if that is not possible, 
opt for an arbitrage. Even more, every time a transaction is completed, each of their endorsers` (eg. each note) is rated. Based on their (un)trusted behaviour, 
Social Proof Trustscore is calculated and presented to other participating endorsers, serving as an important factor of trust for all of one’s upcoming block-
chain-made arrangements. By enhancing trust and ensuring the financial compensation for breached contracts InsurePal greatly supports the execution of 
blind business transactions on blockchain. On one hand, the model keeps insurance premiums as low as not to cause any friction. On the other, the insurance 
enhances the execution of all those transactions that would otherwise need to go  through the complex process of  identity verification in order to establish 
a level of trust. 

INSUREPAL FOR BLOCKCHAIN BUSINESS TRANSACTIONS

USER CASE 2

Recursive/Transitive Deductible

PREMIUM

$99,00
COVERAGE

$10.000,00 1

2

3

4

6

5

7

8

$500

$50 $100 $100

$100

$100

$100

$150

$100

$200

$300

$200

$200

$200

$200

InsurePal itself is not a 
licensed insurance provider.  
Any insurance activity will 
be done in cooperation 
with the licensed insurer 
on local markets. The 
company is building a global 
blockchain-based platform, 
enabling social proofing to be 
conducted in numerous ways 
across different industries.



Distributed social proof insurance8

The key struggle for insurance today remains segmentation and the question on how to 
effectively distinguish clients to properly evaluate risk and prevent frauds and misstated 
data. From the most sophisticated methods for tracking behavior to funding and install-
ing expensive wearable devices, many insurance offerings try to become more present in 
their customers’ live, however their struggle to raise the profitability centres on younger 
drivers. Methods to further improve segmentation are often expensive, invasive and in 
the end the risk evaluation precision is poor. 

Due to this poor segmentation, responsible and diligent insurance clients have an unsat-
isfactory feeling that they are overpaying on account of those who behave irresponsibly. 
This is even more true for mandatory insurance lines, where the perception of respon-
sible and diligent insurance client is that they are forced to keep paying for others while 
getting nothing in return except legal compliance.

Moreover, we have moved into a fully digitalized era, which is extremely innovative and 
promotes new forms and ways of doing business, no matter the scale. As exceptionally 
large institutions, insurance companies are engaged in their stiff bureaucracy and often 
stay reluctant to the emerging needs of specific niche segments in a timely manner as 
they are overly risky for their existing structure.

Poor risk management

Bad market segmentation

Invasion of privacy

Complex regulation

Expensive tracking methods

Extensive gross costs of corpo-
rate structure

Fraud detection & premium 
leakage 

Process and system innovations

What are your organization’s biggest opportunities in the next 2 years?

60%

52%

48%

44%

26%

26%

18%

18%

6%

3%

Improving operational processes
and the use of technology

Digital technology and integration
into business objectives

Customer data analytics to improve
underwriting, pricing and marketing

Strengthening customer
loyality

Cost reduction initiatives

Better use of capital and
management of risk

Changing consumer
needs

Wearables & the Internet of
Things (IoT) including telematics

Biometrics for claims management
and/or cyber security

Mergers & acquisitions
to improve market position and economies of scale

PROBLEM

ORGANIZATIONS’ BIGGEST OPPORTUNITIES IN THE NEXT 2 YEARS

“Insurance is a $7.3 trillion stubbornly old-fashioned goliath that could significantly re-
duce the premium prices if its scheme would allow it to operate with lower-risk clients.”

Source: A new world of opportunity

https://assets.kpmg.com/content/dam/kpmg/pdf/2016/01/the-insurance-innovation-imperative.pdf


Distributed social proof insurance9

SUPPLY SIDE: INSURANCES

Insurance is a service to manage risk, representing a fundamental block of society. By its 
nature, it is risk averse but at the same time, it represents a complex labor-based busi-
ness model with a workforce increasing gross expenses. The traditional sector is run by 
large networks with thousands of employees and the vast cost of daily operations and 
binding contracts preventing them from agility. However, many of their activities are re-
petitive or redundant without creating value and could easily be replaced by automated 
data-driven software and further by self-regulating peer-to-peer insurance models. 

Continuing the theme, as insurers play a vital role in society and their proper function is 
imperative, they are faced with strict capital regulations that demand having more capital 
in reserve than would be needed should a catastrophic event take place. Out of concern 
of navigating these complex requirements the traditional insurers lack the agility to em-
brace disruptive technologies and out-of-the-box approaches. 

Many foreign markets that might provide strong growth potential can also be hard for 
newcomers to break into due to various restrictions including foreign ownership and li-
censes. Insurance companies inability to establish a personal and periodical relationship 
with the customers leaves an open door for competition and continues to reinforce their 
negative perception. 

DEMAND SIDE: CLIENTS 

There has not yet been a clear shift in mindset for insurance providers who still fail to rec-
ognize they need to be customer-centric and that the customers today don`t come for 
a specific product but for a solution to a specific risk they face. Not everyone who seeks 
coverage against a particular loss faces the same probability of also suffering it. Usually 
insures try to evaluate both, the risk and probable magnitude in order to determine the 
appropriate premium level. The premium is then additionally increased with cover trans-
action costs, commissions and profit. 

The insurance costs are determined through classification models that segment people 
into groups sharing similar data, such as age, sex, marital status, residence, driving re-
cord etc. For each of these segments, a “one size fit all” model for all members is calculat-
ed, with no or little further differentiation. Clients experience this in tendency to year-to-
year growth of their insurance policies price, no matter the size of their past claims and 
history of lower-risk behavior. 

Insurance companies should be more concerned with timely anticipating solutions to 
the challenges brought about by the new digital era, greatly marked by blockchain inno-
vation. In this respect, a key factor is the element of trust, since it can preserve credibil-
ity and greatly enhance blockchain-based operations.

“Insuring blockchain business transactions with InsurePal represents a tremendously 
big future market and a huge opportunity for expansion.“



Distributed social proof insurance10

MARKET 

OVERVIEW

According to Forbes, the insurance sector is a $7.3 trillion business worldwide industry 
that has somehow managed to remain largely untouched by technological change. A 
close look to traditional insurance (e.g. motor line of business) company P&L tells that 
for every premium dollar paid to the insurer, $0,65 comes back to policyholders in form 
of exaggerated claims and misstated data, whereas the other goes to operational costs, 
commissions and marketing. In other words, the insurance could reduce the price of the 
policy if the scheme would allow it to operate with low-risk clients only.

Consequently, new entrants, technologies and business models based on a shared econ-
omy are emerging at an increasingly rapid pace, leading to the projection of the decline 
in the global insurance industry. As a solution, a shift to responsibility and ownership is 
proposed to sustain the profitability and growth. 

COMPETITIVE LANDSCAPE

The biggest threats for the insurance industry come in the form of new entrants, intro-
ducing peer-to-peer business models and/or niche products based on innovative tech-
nology. Both of the approaches better-serve the increasingly digitized behaviors of mod-
ern consumers, generating more than 16 billion revenue in a few recent years. 

Source: Insurance: $7 Trillion Goliath. Forbes.

Source: InsureTech 

65%
Claims & claims adjustment

4%
Non-investment profit

2%
Re-insurance fees

10%
Agent commissions

7%
Marketing

12%
Admin cost

HOW PREMIUM DOLLARS ARE SPENT

https://www.forbes.com/sites/arjanschutte/2015/01/21/insurance-7-trillion-goliath/#1743fc9b616c
https://www.munichre.com/en/media-relations/publications/press-releases/2017/2017-04-20-press-release/index.html
https://letstalkpayments.com/101-insurtech-startups-revolutionizing-the-4-5-trillion-dollar-insurance-industry/?utm_content=buffera36f2&utm_medium=social&utm_source=twitter.com&utm_campaign=buffer
https://www.forbes.com/sites/arjanschutte/2015/01/21/insurance-7-trillion-goliath/#230ce5b1616c
https://insurtechnews.com/insight/insurtech-manifesto.html


Distributed social proof insurance11

PEER-TO-PEER (P2P)
The concept of peer-to-peer insurance (P2P) is based on the premise that the responsi-
ble and diligent people overpay their premiums at the expense of others, non-respon-
sible, fraudulent. Peer-to-peer insurance uses crowdsourcing and social networking to 
create a shared insurance experience, getting together through social media, friends 
and family members. The insurers form groups to team up and share each other’s risks 
with everyone contributing money to insure each other’s losses. Usually at the end of 
the year, the individuals with no claims receive a cashback or reduced premiums for the 
next period. 

For insurance the peer-to-peer concept brings lower customer acquisition costs as the 
groups are formed through social networking and crowdsourcing, meaning the role of 
the middlemen is not necessary. Even more, due the information exchange between 
members, the insurance can effectively assume responsibility for the peer-to-peer 
group’s risk selection. By leveraging social media and other networking technologies the 
approach creates an insurance infrastructure at lower expense and builds an agile, cus-
tomer-centric insurance. However, there is still a gap between the ideology of P2P insur-
ance and its scaled execution, preventing the model to be adapted by a large majority.

INSURTECH
Insurtech, a portmanteau of “insurance” and “technology”, are technology-led companies 
that enter the insurance sector, using technology innovations in order to optimize the 
traditional insurance model and create a more digitally savvy customer base. It explores 
the avenues that large insurance companies have less incentive to exploit, from custom-
ized policies to using new streams of data from internet-enabled devices to dynamically 
price premiums according to observed behavior. Interestingly, many insurtech compa-
nies do not own an insurance licence and rather address other components of the value 
chain.

New insurances that usually don’t deal with the challenges of this highly regulated in-
dustry might face difficulties to handle underwriting and manage catastrophic risk. It is 
a slow and gradual process to penetrate the market and become accepted while also 
confronting different regulatory hurdles. A substantial knowledge of insurance industry, 
consumer marketing, social networks and social marketing is needed in order to take full 
advantage of the emerging technologies and at the same time creating a business model 
to fit the masses. While insurtech firms have not yet made a noticeable breakthrough in 
the sector, they are still growing fast and stand to win a noticeable market share in the 
years to come.

“There are several factors influencing the decision on which insurance company one 
chooses. It is not just a competitive price, but also versatility of coverage options, cus-
tomer service, the element of technology and reporting that add to the mix.”

“P2P insurance is a risk sharing network where a group of like-minded individuals pool 
their premiums together to insure against a risk. The membership is selective, meaning 
the group’s peer pressure reinforces responsibility and helps keeping losses down to 
minimum.”

https://www.pwc.com/gx/en/insurance/assets/pwc-insurtech.pdf


Distributed social proof insurance12

Source: BankNXT

InsurePal
Friend-
surance

Lemonade MetroMile

Time to savings Up front End of year (maybe) Up front Save if drive less

Savings amount User chooses, $500+ Fixed/not user deter-
mined

-$100 User chooses, $500+

Profitability Reduces claims 
frequency and cost, 
changes behaviour

Reduce claims cost 
up to a smaller 
extent

Does not reduce 
claims cost

Does not reduce 
claims cost

Market UK, EU, USA, Asia, 
Worldwide

Germany, Australia USA USA

Model MGA to acquisition, 
platform

Insurance broker Insurance company MGA to acquisition

Message to con-
sumer

If your friends trust 
you, we trust you

Feel good (some 
people)

Drive less

Marketing ex-
pense

Peer-to-peer viral 
marketing / less ex-
pensive
Attracting clients 
with extreme dis-
counts

Classical / expensive Classical / expensive Classical / expensive

Insurance
Individual risks are all transfered 

to a central Node creating low 
density & fragility

Centralized network Decentralized network Distributed network

Reinsurance
Connects Insurance companies 
increasing density reducing the 

fragility of centralizing risk

P2P
Further increases network density, 
enabling individual risks to spread 
laterally across peer connections

COMPETITIVE ANALYSIS

OPPORTUNITY

As stated in the PWC report, the most competitive insurance companies should explore 
the technological improvements to better their services. However, at this point, 57% of 
surveyed financial services industry personnel are unsure about or unlikely to respond 
to blockchain technology. They lack the agility and knowledge to use blockchain innova-
tion to succeed in peer-to-peer and mutual markets. The concept of peer-to-peer insur-
ance reestablishes the relationship of trust with grouping the individuals that together 
create a solidarity fund, whilst the blockchain distributed ledger reduces administration 
and claim processing costs. 

https://banknxt.com/60989/02-p2p-risk-markets/
https://www.pwc.com/us/en/insurance/publications/top-insurance-industry-issues-2017.html


Distributed social proof insurance13

TOTAL ADDRESSABLE MARKET

A lot of changes occur in a finance world of today and the young and tech savvy have 
proven to be the most interesting crowd when it comes to adopting them, reports The 
Merkle. They are aware the cryptocurrencies are quickly dethroning traditional invest-
ment, and are very eager to learn, test and experiment more. For that, they are most like-
ly those that will succeed in fully-deploying the blockchain and accept cryptocurrencies 
and tokenization models as the next-generation valid payment methods, as the cryp-
tographically bound peer-to-peer-networks are going to be the defining technologies 
of their lifetime, concludes Forbes. As a primary target, InsurePal therefore addresses 
millennials as young and tech savvy crypto enthusiasts, and expands the market po-
tential of peer-to-peer model to virally reaching to their colleagues, parents and even 
grandparents.

1%
MARKET
SHARE

$70 billion

TOTAL ADRESSABLE MARKET (TAM) IS $7 TRILLION

Considering the fact that almost 80% of all internet users are also active on social media, 
and that there are millions of data points exchanged every minute, the potential to com-
municate digitally and achieve a viral effect with the end-customers is enormous. The 
understanding of target customers’ demographics is therefore crucial for speaking their 
language and responding to their needs.

TOTAL POPULATION

7.524
BILION

URBANISATION

54%

3.819
BILION

PENETRATION

51%

3.028
BILION

PENETRATION

40%

5.052
BILION

PENETRATION

67%

2.780
BILION

PENETRATION

37%

INTERNET USERS ACTIVE SOCIAL MEDIA USERS UNIQUE MOBILE USERS ACTIVE MOBILE SOCIAL USERS

Source: Hootsuite Global Digital Statshot 2017 Q3

GLOBAL DIGITAL SNAPSHOT

https://themerkle.com/millennials-hold-bitcoin-in-higher-regard-than-traditional-stocks/?lipi=urn%3Ali%3Apage%3Ad_flagship3_company%3B4safIU2SRZ%2BXNJniMjpN9Q%3D%3D
https://themerkle.com/millennials-hold-bitcoin-in-higher-regard-than-traditional-stocks/?lipi=urn%3Ali%3Apage%3Ad_flagship3_company%3B4safIU2SRZ%2BXNJniMjpN9Q%3D%3D
https://www.forbes.com/sites/ksamani/2017/10/04/how-crypto-will-reshape-capitalism-as-we-know-it/2/#19ac4c1e6ed4
https://www.slideshare.net/wearesocialsg/global-digital-statshot-q3-2017


Distributed social proof insurance14

TARGET CUSTOMERS: MILLENNIALS & TECH-SAVVY CRYPTO 
ENTHUSIASTS

The Millennials, also known as Generation Y or Net Generation, are those individuals who 
reached adulthood around the turn of the 21st century. They are the first to grow up in a 
completely digital world, meaning they formed their opinions during a time of rapid tech-
nological progress. With similar speed Millennials absorb information, connect with a 
brand and choose a product. According to The Guardian, besides flexibility, fairness and 
tolerance, they most desire for capitalism (which worked well for previous generations) 
to fulfil its promise to them. 

They are also the most underinsured generation today, which makes sense as they have 
fewer assets compared to older generations. Due their age the insurance companies 
lack their historical data that serves as a proof of their low-risk behaviour. Consequently, 
the millennials are often obliged to pay tremendously high premiums in different lines 
of insurance. 

According to a recent study by pewresearch.org, by 2030 the millennials will make up 
75% of the workforce and will be the most powerful generation in shaping purchase 
decision. To successfully gear towards the digital natives who will soon represent the 
world`s biggest target market the marketing tactics and products need to address a 
different set of behaviours and experiences and offer a personalized, technology-friendly 
and customer-oriented experience.

To our target customers, the component of virality and power of social media play a cru-
cial role in how they will learn and/or promote the product. As they are prone to adopting 
new solutions and are not as loyal to brands, they can easily change alliances. Hence, 
InsurePal fills the gap as a different insurance provider offering an engaging and inter-
active experience, following the latest trends in product differentiation and especially in 
adoption of the new, disruptive technology.

https://www.theguardian.com/world/2016/mar/08/generation-y-curling-or-maybe-what-the-world-calls-millennials
http://pewresearch.org/
http://www.goldmansachs.com/our-thinking/pages/millennials/
http://www.goldmansachs.com/our-thinking/pages/millennials/


Distributed social proof insurance15

The millennials’ affinity for technology is reshaping the marketing space and the bound-
aries between categories begin to blur, as the consumers no longer wish to be singled 
out only on the basis of their income, gender, ethnicity or education. Insurance as an 
industry has failed to do that, and consequently, insurance companies today are not the 
most popular; on the contrary, besides being perceived boring they are also associated 
with increasingly high costs.

The young and tech savvy are also most likely the generation that will succeed in ful-
ly-deploying the blockchain and accept cryptocurrencies and tokenization models as 
next-generation valid payment methods as the cryptographically bound peer-to-peer-
networks are going to be the defining technologies of their lifetime, as stated in Forbes. 

The component of virality and power of social media play a crucial role in how the millen-
nials will learn and/or promote the product. As they are prone to testing new products 
and are not as loyal to brands they can change alliances quickly. Hence, InsurePal can en-
ter as an innovative provider offering them an engaging and interactive experience, fol-
lowing the latest trends in product differentiation and adoption of disruptive technology. 

21.7%
MORE LIKELY TO BE MAC USER

21.3%
MORE INTERESTED IN DATA MINING

18.8%
MORE INTERESTED IN PHOTOSHOP

3.1%
MORE LIKELY TO BE INTERESTED IN
TECHNOLOGY IN GENERAL

11.6%
MORE LIKELY TO OWN AN IPHONE

12.6%
MORE INTERESTED IN FILE SHARING

MILLENNIALS AS CONSUMERS: DIGITAL NATIVES & TECH SAVY

INSUREPAL: P2P MODEL & BLOCKCHAIN TECHNOLOGY

Big data

Invasive telematics

Social / Viral / Disruptive

Privacy invasions



Solution



Distributed social proof insurance17

INSUREPAL 

THE IDEA BEHIND

Insurance is a thousand years old method that originated as an arrangement between 
small communities knowing each other well, especially merchants who gathered to pay 
to insure their goods being shipped together. In essence, any loss was personal and 
participants actively tried to avoid letting each other down. Bad participants were rec-
ognised and excluded from the group, as the trust between the participants is essential. 
The principle of collected premiums between trusted parties was forgotten through-
out the history as more and more specialized insurance varieties developed. InsurePal 
adapts the old idea with a blockchain innovation to fit the needs of modern society. 

SOCIAL PROOF IN PSYCHOLOGY 

Social proof is the influence that the actions and attitudes of the people around us (ei-
ther in real life or online) have on our own behavior. The “proof” element is the idea that 
if other people are doing it, it must be correct. Among the first who presented the social 
proof and ranked it among 6 universal principles that influence our affirmative behavior 
was Dr. Robert Cialdini in his book The psychology of Persuasion. He described the con-
cept as a tendency, driven by people’s natural desire to behave “correctly” under most 
circumstances, almost as it is built in our basic moral structure. Since, social proof as a 
pattern stimulating wanted behaviour has been widely popularized by the web and sev-
eral other studies have re-confirmed that highlighting positive norms works better than 
pointing out the restrictions. Hence, especially in social interactions, social proof can help 
people to protect themselves from committing actions that would be frowned upon by 
others or fall below standard expectation.

“Social proof is a psychological phenomenon influencing people to take actions and 
make decisions differently than they would if they had relied solely upon their own 
judgment. In other words, people reference the behavior of others to guide their own 
behavior.”

https://www.amazon.com/dp/006124189X?tag=useitcomusablein
https://www.influenceatwork.com/principles-of-persuasion/


Distributed social proof insurance18

SOCIAL PROOF IN INSURANCE

The mechanism of social proof is applicable to different types of the already existing 
insurance, and at the same time enables us to become pioneers in creating niche in-
surance solutions, brought-about with the blockchain innovation. The business mod-
el allows InsurePal global platform to scale quickly and disrupting both, the traditional 
and niche segments by firstly creating social proof insurance modules for blockchain 
business transactions and motor car insurance, followed with the development of social 
proof modules for life, health and property segments as well.

BASIC MODEL

Social proof bespokes the insurance industry by the use of a form of financial commit-
ment. InsurePal introduces it as a principle of a third party deductible, combining a classi-
cal deductible with a third party endorsement that works as a social proof of an individual 
insuree. The endorser who financially guarantees for the individual has to use its own 
due diligence when providing the guarantee to at the risk of losing their money. In other 
words, the basic idea in the logic behind the InsurePal model is that every statement 
backed with financial guarantee immediately gains in value and credibility.

InsurePal model is self-regulating hybrid of a classical insurance and peer-to-peer en-
dorsements on blockchain, backed with social proof. To avoid any scepticism, InsurePal 
offers a limited fee guarantee and variety of options to ensure one reasonably saves 
up compared to traditional policies. Through such endorsements and guarantees, the 
insurance network in whole becomes more and more risk aware and consequently in-
duces a change of people’s behavior to better. 

Motor
Blockchain

business
transactions

Life & Health Property



Distributed social proof insurance19

RECURSIVE/TRANSITIVE MODEL

The basic InsurePal social proof model works as a third-party deductible. When the 
third-party makes an endorsement, he/she guarantees to pay for the deductible in case 
of claims. The fact that a person is prepared to give another an endorsement with an im-
posed financial obligation, gives that person a much greater credibility. At the same time, 
it also motivates the insurer to act more responsibly, knowing that the financial burden 
of his unwanted behavior will be felt directly by his/her endorser. 

The social proof mechanism can be applied to an insured having more than one endors-
er, too. As each new endorser also has their own social proof network, a hierarchical 
social proof virtual network establishes. In the event of a claim, one’s first (direct) social 
proof endorsers pay the most, whereas all indirect connections (secondary, tertiary, etc.) 
pay exponentially less.

For the allowance to be financially exposed in case of at fault claim, each endorser re-
ceives a financial incentive by InsurePal, collected from blockchain transaction fees and 
insurance premium payments. This is an extremely relevant improvement to the already 
existing peer-to-peer models. Due the social pressure from all insured`s endorsers, the 
model will promote self-regulation, whereas the endorsers that will not adhere to the 
rules will be automatically expelled. Such smart peer-to-peer endorsements (and that 
of their peers) will ensure that diligence is rewarded by collecting the money from the 
untrustworthy, as there will be more paid deductibles than awards received.

Even more, every time an endorser is involved in an insurance operation, he/she (namely 
their node) is rated based on their diligence, receiving a Social Proof Trustscore, a factor 
that tells all the other participating endorsers whether or how much one can be trust-



Distributed social proof insurance20

SOCIAL PROOF TRUSTSCORE

InsurePal social proof network will exponentially expand in order to allow multiple en-
dorsements and mutual recursion, providing the community with a precise insight of 
who is endorsing who and for how much. This valuable data will serve for InsurePal to 
generate Social Proof Trustscore, a factor that will calculate a real-time average value 
directly reflecting who is trustworthy to make blockchain-made agreements with.

Recursive/Transitive Deductible

PREMIUM

$99,00
COVERAGE

$10.000,00 1

2

3

4

6

5

7

8

$500

$50 $100 $100

$100

$100

$100

$150

$100

$200

$300

$200

$200

$200

$200

ed. Each node will be able to decide whether to give the endorsement to the insured 
person only or to their entire social network. The financial incentives will be distributed 
accordingly, promoting recursion and growth of the node`s Social Proof Trustscore in-
dex. InsurePal will introduce the recursive model with a careful observation of the entire 
blockchain economy and in partnership with arbitrage and identity systems in order to 
fully exploit its potential. 



Distributed social proof insurance21

INSUREPAL PATENT

On its own, social proof methodology is not new and is a concept widely used for mar-
keting in different industries. Nevertheless, this is a first time we have managed to suc-
cessfully reinvent it in the insurance industry. For that reason, the innovative approach 
of policy with an endorser has been filed for patent protection in the United States and 
worldwide.

This gives InsurePal an unique competitive advantage as all the insurances that will want 
to adopt the concept of social proof will be legally obliged to use InsurePal platform solu-
tion, as any other use can be considered as infringement. 

http://www.freepatentsonline.com/y2017/0243298.html

“By becoming an early adopter of blockchain technology, InsurePal can gain an import-
ant competitive advantage whilst improving transparency and outcomes across the en-
tire value chain.”

http://www.freepatentsonline.com/y2017/0243298.html


Roadmap



Distributed social proof insurance23

ROADMAP WITH INVESTMENT CLIFFS 

InsurePal is changing the concept of insurance as we know it today. Due the fact we’re 
disrupting one of the state’s most regulated industries we must commit to strictly comply 
with the requirements of regulators in spite of innovation in order to preserve the trust 
of all of our stakeholders. By designing our Roadmap, we want to provide the team with 
optimum working conditions, as we are aware of the scale and complexity of the work 
that is ahead of us. We set our goals on the dot with the commitment to deliver our 
promise in due time and thus preserve your trust and our primacy in the field of insur-
ance of the future.

Q1

Founders test the 
market within their 
professional market 
fields to discover irregu-
larities. 

Q2

Social proof is  identified as a potential solution. 

Founders invest close to $500.000 to develop the model 
and web application demo. Model is calibrated to 
real-market data.

Q3

Q2 Q4

Q4

Calibrated mathematical 
algorithms confirm the 
thesis the social proof 
model brings from 30% 
and up to 70% cost 
reduction, insofar as the 
insurance company 
operates with lower-risk 
clients.

Q1

January 16th
IPL token crowdsale 

The  development of InsurePal platform core and the 
implementation of the blockchain related functionalities 
begins. 

First, the  module for blockchain business transactions is 
developed, and a module for motor car insurance follows. 

InsurePal commits to informing the community about the 
progress and begins with its  first branding campaign. 

Q2 Q4

Q1

InsurePal founders file for social proof insurance patent 
protection  in US and worldwide.
A detailed business plan to pitch the idea to VC in Silicon 
Valley is developed.
Several million investment is offered to buy-out the idea, 
but InsurePal refuses in order to develop it in the direc-
tion they envisage.

Q3

InsurePal social-proof insurance methodology, including a 
viability assessment and a legal review of the project  is 
further developed.
Blockchain is identified as an ideal innovation for a 
peer-to-peer insurance model implementation.
Several meetings with different crypto think-tanks in 
Switzerland, Russia, Slovenia, UK occur.
InsurePal core team is assembled.

Q2 Q4Q1

Partnership with Netis blockchain consultancy is made to 
complete the methodology and develop a sustainable 
token model. InsurePal team expands with new blockchain 
and technology experts.

Q3

The  architectural design of the platform and its func-
tionalities begins. Parallely, the extensive preparations 
for ICO (InsurePal token crowdsale) go about.

Q2 Q4Q1

Additional functionalities to be implemented in InsurePal 
platform.

Partnership with Interested third-parties to use  Insure-
Pal platform is gaining strength and is further promoted..

Implementation of claims community handling model 
begins.

Q3

InsurePal platform to become a “to-go” global social 
proof insurance. 

Q3

Vast motor car insurance module performance, unit and 
user acceptance testing is set in motion. 

Simple integration and set-up with core insurance system 
to support InsurePal operations occurs.

MGA insurance licence for UK market is obtained.

Social proof pilot project is ready to be launched on the 
UK market, supported with a marketing & PR campaign. 

Social proof modules for life and health are ready to be 
developed.

Meanwhile,  the preparation for InsurePal production 
platform deployment begins.  

InsurePal starts with extensive legal and regulatory 
preparations to obtain the EU passport licence.

Interested third-parties are invited to using InsurePal 
social proof  modules. 

Improvement and development of  blockchain transac-
tions insurance module continues.

2015

2016

2017

2018

2019



Distributed social proof insurance24

INSUREPAL ALGORITHM 

To calculate premium rates for policyholders, insurances usually use a predetermined 
algorithm based on acquired data, so their underwriters gauge the risk of individual filing 
a claim and a claim size. The premiums are based on several key indicators which finally 
dictate the price of the policy. During this process everything from predictive behavior 
to social media comprehensive analysis can be used as a verifying proof of someone’s 
potential exposure to claims.

In motor industry, car insurance is mandatory, as the costs of potential damage or dan-
ger may include repair or rent of vehicles, medical care or even legal assistance. The 
insurance algorithm therefore compares different variables from age, address, marital 
status to gender and driving record to calculate the end-price of a specific premium. 
All these data were included in our predictive analysis as well to determine whether the 
social-proof model withholds all possible scenarios.

InsurePal too uses a similar basic algorithm to calculate the client’s premium based on 
a short questionnaire data to be able to undercut the premium price with a social proof 
by using an advanced InsurePal algorithm. All necessary data can be acquired by a client 
taking photo of his/her existing policy and in case of motor ca rinsurance, by also taking 

Projected Claim Events

Frequency Risk Factor

correlated

Poisson

Log-normal

Severity Risk Factor

Projected Severity

Projected Claims

0.2

0.4

0.6

0.8

1.0

0.4 0.6 0.8

SE
VE

RI
TY

 R
IS

K 
FA

CT
O

R

Frequency Risk Factor Per Driver:

frequency_rf <- rpois(n = n, lambda = 0.5 * 100) / 100

Frequency Risk Factor Per Driver (related to frequency risk factor):

severity_rf <- rpois(n = n, lambda = frequency_rf * 100) / 100

FREQUENCY RISK FACTOR

PROOF OF CONCEPT



Distributed social proof insurance25

a photo of his/her driving license and vehicle basic documentation. This is also the case 
with other lines of insurance: basic documents are collected to be able to undercut the 
with social proof algorithm.

It was determined that by targeting solely the segment of lower-risk drivers (with a prov-
en history record) the claims frequency significantly reduces, leading the insurances in-
surers to a better clients` segmentation and a significant decrease in policy prices for 
diligent and responsible clients.

The nature of our proposed decentralised business model motivates self-regulation 
within the community as the risk-prone individuals are automatically expelled from the 
scheme. The bigger the community gets, the more possibilities for their peer-to-peer en-
dorsers appear, until only the biggest claims demand the reinsurance of classic models. 
As a consequence, even more and larger discounts can be offered to the community 
instead of feeding the expensive bureaucratic apparatus.

0

0

500

1000

1500

2000

2500

2 4 6 8 10 12 14 16

Safe drivers
Most profitable segment

YEARS WITH NO CLAIM

N
U

M
BE

R

77%
of Auto Insurance operating costs are 

from claims

70% REDUCTION OF CLAIMS WITH A SCHEME OF LOW-RISK DRIVERS IS POSSIBLE 



Distributed social proof insurance26

INSUREPAL TEST PILOT: UK

InsurePal will ultimately become a decentralized platform that will enable the manage-
ment and application of social proof to various types of insurances. In its first develop-
ment phase, a pilot will be run to test the concept on a Great Britain market, known to be 
the cradle of insurance industry. There are several reasons why the timing for a launch 
in Great Britain is opportune as the price of motor car insurance is constantly increasing 
and results of insurance companies are not substantially improved. 

According to the Association of British Insurers, UK drivers are paying an average $644 
(£484 on 1.11.2017) for an annual insurance policy, up $64 (£48 on 1.11.2017) in the last 
12 months. The 11% increase in 2017 is also the biggest year-on-year rise since the ABI 
began tracking premiums for private cars in 2012.

For the reasons stated above, InsurePal targets millennials and tech savvy to become 
social proof ensurance early adopters. Due to their age, the younger generation in Great 
Britain don’t have an insurance history, making it even more difficult for the insurers 
to properly assess their risk. Consequently, they are usually the ones with sky-rocket 
premiums and at the same time the lowest income. This means that their policy is more 
expensive that the car they are driving. But in reality, not all of them are high risk drivers. 

To fix this paradoxical situation, InsurePal is using knowledge among their friends, family 
members, colleagues and coworkers about their driving habits by making an assumption 
that their closest acquaintances will be able to evaluate them objectively. Knowing the 
driving habits is not the only key. Knowing that person is in general responsible and dili-
gent is the key of proper evaluation.

30 million insured personal cars
3 million drivers with a 5-year track 
history of accident-free

UK ADRESSABLE MARKET

300M
300M

500M

700M

https://www.theguardian.com/money/2017/jul/18/cost-of-car-insurance-in-uk-hits-record-high-after-11-jump-in-12-months


Blockchain



Distributed social proof insurance28

BLOCKCHAIN INTEGRATION

PRINCIPLES OF DECENTRALIZED ECONOMY

Blockchain is essentially a permanent and immutable record of transactions within a net-
work. At its core are “digital ledgers” that are distributed amongst all network participants 
to serve as a common source of “truth”. The system that relies on references to other 
blocks that are cryptographically secure within the digital ledger is much more trans-
parent than traditional approaches to sharing data across a value chain. By eliminating 
the need for intermediaries it carries the potential to disrupt existing business models. 
Blockchain allows for a more transparent and trustworthy service for consumers, whilst 
offering significant efficiency and reduced overheads for the service providers. 

Arising blockchain economies have smaller utilisation than traditional fiat economies, 
therefore their currency value should be proportionally smaller. However, in opposite to 
non-inflationary blockchain economy, the majority of fiat economies are printing money 
and are inflationary. For that, the blockchain economy needs some sort of utilisation to 
support its value growth.

The value of any decentralized economy becomes the value of its underlying currency. If 
economy and its token prove a valuable utilization, the price of the currency increases, 
meaning the more economical added value there is, the higher the price of its token gets. 
In case of InsurePal, this is the role of a social proof guarantee that rewards responsible 
and diligent clients with bigger insurance discounts. Due the fact the insurance industry 
in traditional and fiat economy is big, we can reasonably assume the utilisation of Insure-
Pal tokenized economy will be significant in size as well.

DISTRIBUTED SOCIAL PROOF INSURANCE

Over 15 years of experience in the field of insurance advanced IT systems and solution 
development have given us an in-depth insight into the insurance business and allowed 
us to design a product that will revolutionize the insurance industry of today. Now, we 
are ready to transform this knowledge by building an insurance company of tomorrow by 
bringing out the essence of trust in a smart digital way by applying the blockchain tech-
nology. The key elements of InsurePal distributed social proof platform that will gradually 
become the “internet of insurance” are decentralization and tokenization. 

Consequently, the underwriting of insurance policies, payment system, social proof and 
even claims handling are dealt with the application of smart contracts, run on the Ethe-
reum public blockchain. In addition, the adaptation of technology allows the assessment 
of the risk profile of insurance customers and their segmentation into risk groups based 
on their network of trusted social acquaintances.

“In case of InsurePal, the social proof carries embedded the value of its underlying IPL 
token currency by rewarding diligent clients with significant premium discounts.”



Distributed social proof insurance29

DECENTRALIZED BUSINESS MODEL GROWS TRUST AND TRANSPARENCY

Blockchain application in insurance could have a significant impact on forecasting risk 
and liability for payment of future benefits and ascertaining premium rates and cash 
reserves, real time data flows and claims determination impact support processes and 
therefore provide faster insights for reserve calculation. Within the reinsurance pool 
retrocessions are assessed in an automated manner using smart contracts. Exposure 
to loss is reduced, risk is transferred to higher limits and revenues are settled by diver-
sification.

PATENTED INNOVATION WITH NO OR LITTLE COMPETITION BRINGS RELEVANT ADVANTAGE

As early adopters of blockchain technology, we enter market that has been so far rigor-
ously regulated. There is no real competition that could address both, the knowledge 
of innovative technology as well as the industry know-how without losing a significant 
amount of time. By addressing both, B2C and B2B markets, InsurePal is introducing a 
innovative and highly scalable solution, interesting to a wide array of market.
 

PEER TO PEER MODEL ENFORCES RESPONSIBILITY AND SELF-REGULATION 

Trust among the participants motivates them to promote safe habitual patterns and de-
motivates them from filing smaller claims. For the majority of individuals, the P2P social 
proof scheme works better than any of the currently existing standard insurances. With 
enforced responsibility, individuals with risky behavior are eliminated by their social con-
tacts, meaning that the scheme is self-regulated by the clients.

REAL-TIME PEER TO PEER DATA SHOW REALISTIC ASSESSMENT OF AN INDIVIDUAL

Deductibles work because of their underwriting effect of reinforcing self-awareness. We 
are all prone to assess our habits. Guarantees of our trusted social network will provide a 
person (and InsurePal) with a wider and reasonably more objective perspective. By con-
tinuously assessing oneself and others, the clients and their social proof contacts will re-
inforce self-regulation, significantly reducing the frequency of claims of insured portfolio. 
Assessments among family, friends and colleagues guarantee real-time segmentation 
and correlating premium rates.

DISTRIBUTED MODEL BRINGS SIGNIFICANT PRICE REDUCTION FOR A GENERATION WITH MUCH 
LOWER INCOME

An easy-to-use discounting model is especially alluring to a generation with a significantly 
lower income. By introducing the element of virality and social endorsements, InsurePal 
addresses the needs of millennials who mainly communicates via social media. Even 
more, by respecting data privacy, it also responds to their growing reluctance to share 
their data. An end-to-end product will be available as dAPP, making it easy for our prima-
ry target group to download it and access it via mobile.

“InsurePal sees the blockchain innovation as an opportunity to improve efficiency, in-
crease transparency, lower the costs of transaction processing, enhance the customer 
experience, improve data quality and increase trust between parties and support audit-
ability, among other benefits.”

https://assets.kpmg.com/content/dam/kpmg/xx/pdf/2017/01/blockchain-accelerates-insurance-transformation-fs.pdf
https://assets.kpmg.com/content/dam/kpmg/xx/pdf/2017/01/blockchain-accelerates-insurance-transformation-fs.pdf
https://www.bcgperspectives.com/Images/MS/motor-insurance-download-pdf.html
https://www.bcgperspectives.com/Images/MS/motor-insurance-download-pdf.html


Distributed social proof insurance30

BLOCKCHAIN & SMART CONTRACTS INTEGRATION

For InsurePal P2P electronic insurance system, blockchain represents a foundational 
technology that allows the embedment of social proof guarantee into the IPL token with 
an introduction of self-executing smart contracts when all the predetermined conditions 
are met. 

INSUREPAL SMART CONTRACT FOR PREMIUMS

Smart contract is autonomous and executes without the help of a third party. The smart 
contract will be deployed on blockchain to replace the old-fashioned “paper” business, 
immediately accelerating transparency and data integrity whilst at the same time gaining 
on agility. The InsurePal smart contract will in detail define the relationship between the 
insurer, the endorser (or endorsers) and the policyholder. Smart contract will trigger the 
collection of guarantees in a transparent manner if or when all prerequisites are met 
and will handle endorsers rewarding as well. The process will be initiated with a request 
from the potential customer (insured person) and a quote sent, accepted and digitally 
contracted by way of fiat currency endorsed by the guarantor credit card or issued by 
digital guarantee on blockchain nominated in fiat or digital currency. 

INSUREPAL SMART CONTRACT FOR CLAIMS ADJUSTMENT

InsurePal understands the claims in insurance need to be assessed objectively and in-
terestingly, all insurance products with parametric claims (meaning where claims size 
and difficulty can be assessed statistically from publically available database) can in fact 
be handled automatically. With InsurePal, all claims will at first be handled in traditional 
manner by outsourcing them to the established companies. The system will support 
claims filing and management with integration to an insurance core system. This will 
lead to small claims soon be handled by InsurePal community. The claims adjustor will 
be selected randomly from an approved list of service providers. They will submit digital 
evidence of their assessment including recommendation of actions with estimates. For 
transparency, the InsurePal will randomly select claims adjusters to assess small claims. 
The other claims adjusters will be offered the opportunity to beat the price proposed 
and identify how that offer will not compromise on quality. Each claim will be reviewed by 
two other independent claims adjusters.

MEMBERSHIP AND COMMUNITY GROWTH

Community members can be minority or majority partners and can increase/decrease 
their stake in their community group. For example, you can enter as a single guarantor 
and build you confidence over a period of time allowing your peer group to support your 
growth measuring against the impact on the group risk responsibility. 



Distributed social proof insurance31

BUSINESS TO CUSTOMER (B2C)

InsurePal dAPP: For the end users, InsurePal will provide a customer-centric experi-
ence, allowing them to easily navigate through the process and at the same time obtain 
the most favorable insurance premium via their mobile devices. The InsurePal dAPP will 
serve as an entry point to the the InusrePal ecosystem, enabling users to create their 
blockchain identity and directing them to start using IPL tokens hassle free.

The InsurePal dAPP will include different functionalities, such as: 

 » Identity creation
 » Social proof identification
 » Token wallet creation 
 » Insurance policy administration
 » Claims filing and management
 » Integration with an insurance core system to manage all insurance administration 
 » Integration with a credit card payment system and banking payment system
 » Finding social endorsers
 » Giving social endorsements 
 » Make payments
 » Take photos and claim damages 
 » Communicate with InsurePal supporters and community
 » Enable access to Social Proof Trustscore scoring & rating

BUSINESS TO BUSINESS (B2B)

The InsurePal platform will act as a global provider of various insurance modules based 
on social proof mechanics. That way all interested third-parties will be able to use the 
platform as stand-alone providers at their country level by paying a predetermined fee 
(to be yet established) and growing their businesses by re-selling social proof insurances. 

INSUREPAL PLATFORM
Blockchain layer
InsurePal platform (Ethereum + smart contracts)

Module layer
Social proof modules for different isnurance segments

Concept layer
InsurePal patent

B2C

end user

B2B
 3rd party insurance

B2B
 3rd party telco

B2B
 3rd party retail

% fee



Distributed social proof insurance32

INTERNET OF INSURANCE 

We are certain that underwriting technology will play a significant role across the insur-
ance value chain from acquiring clients, recording their requirements through the pro-
cessing and adjudication of their claims with quicker turnaround reducing recovery risks. 
Thereby, we have thoroughly considered each development step to fully comply with 
regulatory demands and local jurisdiction and came up with a solution roadmap that will 
allow our users a moderate transition to a fully tokenized model and at the same time 
ensure the highest level of safety, preserving the trust of all stakeholder. 

That way, InsurePal will lead the clients (B2B and B2C) to a fully decentralized service step 
by step and at the same time serve as a sample case of how to conduct P2P insurance, 
harnessing the power of blockchain technology. Upon taking this approach, regulatory 
challenges will be excluded as the claims reserve will be collected and stored in fiat cur-
rency until we can ensure with certainty the stability of the proposed model and crypto 
currency to the regulator. 

“A moderate transition into a fully tokenized service will ensure the highest level of 
quality, preserve the trust of all stakeholders and intuitively lead the clients to a new, 
decentralized internet of insurance.”

InsurePal platform

B2C B2BInsurePal API

In
su

re
Pa

l
Se

rv
ic

e 
bu

s

Ethereum Blockchain Network

Finance &
Accounting

B2B, Facebook,
Mail, Twitter,
Payment
services,
Jaxx ...

Insurance Core

3rd Party Apps 3rd Party Insurance 3rd Party Telco 3rd Party Retail

Exchange

Buy/Sell on
exchange
(smartcontract)

InsurePal
Smart
contract

Fiat
exchange
service

Payment
Processor(s)

InsurePal
dAPP(s)

IPFS



Distributed social proof insurance33

UNDERLYING TECHNOLOGY 

BLOCKCHAIN DISTRIBUTED LEDGER

InsurePal dApps and smart contracts will be build on top of Ethereum (a Next-Genera-
tion Smart Contract and Decentralized Application Platform). Ethereum blockchain is In-
surePal first choice due to its widespread acceptance within the blockchain community, 
carrying a great future potential for our platform’s scalability, flexibility and versatility in 
the long run.

FRONT-END/UI 

All web and mobile applications supporting end-users and InsurePal business opera-
tions will be build upon most reliable and innovative technologies up to this date e.g. Re-
act (front-end) and Node.js, combined with Java EE (back-end). We are dedicated to put 
ergonomics and user experience (UX) on top of our priorities when building user-face 
applications. The dApps development will be user-centric by keeping “mobile-first” ap-
proach and responsive design in mind, taking into account corresponding applications 
for Android and iOS systems as well. 

Important notice: A web pilot demonstrating the handling of processes from acquiring a client and their 
policy to them taking documents photos and inviting the endorsers via social networks and cashing-in 
discounts is already operational and in place as POC (Proof of Concept) application. 

BACK-END/BUSINESS LOGIC 

Back-end (InsurePal business logic) will require a mixture of Node.js and Java EE tech-
nologies, depending on specific use cases. Server business logic supporting React-built 
mobile and web interfaces will use Node.js for its realization. Both, React and Node.js 
are proven to be fast, reliable and lightweight when combined. The more demanding 
business logic and complex implementations of advanced variable business rules will be 
handled by Java EE technology. 

React UI

Node.js

Web3

Ethereum blockchain DB
Distributed
storage

DB driver IPFS API

Java EE

Android iOS

https://www.google.com/url?q=https://github.com/InsurePal/InsurePalApp_POC&sa=D&ust=1511169919120000&usg=AFQjCNEN-GLxD9QykG8Oox7hWVAdy_UcVg


Distributed social proof insurance34

STORAGE

The InsurePal platform will eventually migrate to IPFS distributed storage layer as a per-
fect match to blockchain network, ensuring a fast and reliable storage e.g. documents 
and media files reporting loss cases, digitalized repository for insurance policies, scanned 
IDs and endorsement letters etc. In the meantime, the storage layer will be handled in 
a classic manner by using a combination of relational and/or NoSQL databases, all de-
pending on the transactions volume growth. 

INTEGRATION LAYER

Modular and flexible integration layer will include a service bus for in-platform integra-
tions with insurance core systems. An open API and RESTfull services will be used to 
enable quick scalability of InsurePal social proof model with third-party providers (B2B). 
Blockchain ledger integration will be done via currently available and tested libraries e.g. 
web3j & web3js for UI & (business logic for blockchain ledger integration), java-ipfs-api 
(IPFS integration) and JSON/REST (social media and payment services). Due the fact the 
blockchain-related technologies rapidly advance, we reserve the right to replace any of 
the mentioned services with a more suitable solution. 



IPL Token



Distributed social proof insurance36

INSUREPAL (IPL) TOKEN 
 
InsurePal token (IPL) will be the fuel of InsurePal platform used by clients and InsurePal 
third-party business partners worldwide. For each new insurance premium conducted 
via InsurePal platform, the IPL token will be used. Tokenizing property will allow InsurePal 
to uniquely identify insurance assets and transform the information to other types of 
businesses via a digital record, containing information about one’s social proof. InsurePal 
platform will use different means to incentivize participants to use it and tokens will be 
listed on different exchanges to simplify the trading process and make the token avail-
able to a broad audience. 

IPL TOKEN FOR INSURANCE OF BLOCKCHAIN BUSINESS TRANSACTIONS

The insurance of blockchain business transactions with social proof will be done in IPL 
tokens solely, meaning that the client will have to purchase the premium with IPL to-
kens. For each of their endorsers, the incentive will have to be paid in IPL tokens as well, 
whereas their guarantee can be done by IPL lock-in or differently (with the use of credit 
card, credit note etc.). Even more, all fees coming from the side of possible participating 
insurance companies and other third-parties will have to be paid with IPL tokens as well. 
For that, this kind of insurance transactions will greatly grow the InsurePal liquidity pool 
and importantly improve the trust and flow of blockchain business transactions. 

IPL TOKEN AS AN INSURANCE PREMIUM DISCOUNT

To receive the InsurePal insurance, clients will be asked to take and upload a photo of 
their existing insurance policy. The InsurePal will then calculate and offer each client 
a discount, proportionate to the size of their endorsers` guarantee. This way, every 
client will receive a specific number of tokens, representing the exact amount of their 
estimated discount according to a current market value. In the first phase, the client will 
also be able to opt out for the cash discount in the form of lower premium price. In this 
case, the cash discount will account for approximately 20% less than the value of the 
estimated token discount. 

IPL TOKEN AS AN UPFRONT INCENTIVE

For each new social proof guarantee, the endorser will receive a guarantee premium/
reward in local fiat currency or in IPL tokens. The endorser will be able to sell the IPL 
tokens immediately or speculate and wait for an even higher market value or to save 
them to buy insurance policy in the future.

IPL AS CREDIT SCORE AND SOCIAL PROOF SCORE

Social proof endorsers will be able to make the guarantee with the credit card or via a 
smart contract. Their social proof guarantee will consist of relevant information on the 
client (the insurance holder) and will serve to them as a credit report. If several endors-
ers will guarantee for the same person, their credit score will proportionally increase in 
value. In parallel to token transactions, these information will be stored in the general 
ledger being partially encrypted and partially public. The encrypted part will only be 
disclosed publically if its holder approves. 



Distributed social proof insurance37

IPL AS A SOCIAL PROOF IDENTITY

The clients holding IPL will be able to identify themselves within the InsurePal Commu-
nity. Even more, in the long run they will be able to sell their own social proof guarantee 
without revealing their identity to institutions or reinsurers in order to get the guaran-
tee and a proportionate share of their insurance premium.

IPL FOR CLAIMS ADJUSTMENT

In the future, the InsurePal may appoint some members of their InsurePal community 
to process and report on the claims, a service that will have a financial incentive. Claims 
which go beyond an agreed threshold (exact amount to be decided) will be decided 
by professional claims adjusters who will report their recommendations to InsurePal 
before informing the client. In essence, there is no insurance company involvement as 
everything is settled by the community on the bases of blockchain and smart contracts.

IPL LIQUIDITY POOL 

Discount conversion to tokens will be incentivised, therefore InsurePal will have to con-
vert a significant percentage (from 10% to 30% for classical insurance segments and, 
100% for blockchain business transactions insurance) of each new premium into IPL 
tokens and give the tokens back to InsurePal clients and their social proof endorsers. 

To continue, all third-party businesses (eg. retailers, telecoms etc.) selling their social 
proof insurance products via InsurePal platform will be obliged to use IPL tokens and 
trade with them on exchanges. The adoption of InsurePal social proof model will make 
it obligatory for third-parties to embed their client` social proof data by InsurePal plat-
form. Any fees for using InsurePal social proof insurance platform will have to be paid in 
IPL tokens as well.

By selling more and more new policies, there will be more and more demand for to-
kens, creating a solid liquidity pool for exchanging tokens to fiat and vice versa, sup-
porting the growth of IPL token price. InsurePal model guarantees a high liquidity of IPL 

Guarantee/Endorser

LIQUIDITY
POOL

Insured person

IPL token/credit card down payment
on insurance

IPL token/credit card guarantee

IPL upfront bonus as incentive
(for Endorser)



Distributed social proof insurance38

tokens, enabling the token holders to sell their tokens at any time. In case of a big IPL 
token price growth special token split/denomination processes will be set in motion.

The estimate is that not all of the acquired tokens will be sold immediately, meaning 
the demand will always be higher than the supply. In line with the mass adoption of 
cryptocurrencies, the demand and usability of IPL token will grow and consequently, IPL 
will become a go-to currency of arising alternate insurance industry. The tokens will be 
bought solely on exchanges from other token holders.

IPL TOKEN CROWDSALE

The issuance of the IPL tokens will be controlled by a smart contract deployed on Ethe-
reum network. The token will conform to the ERC20 standard. The minimum target for 
the crowdsale is set to Ether equivalent of $5 million while the hard cap will be at set 
at $18 million in total. Base token price upon the launch of the crowdsale will be set to 
$0.10.
 
InsurePal doesn’t support uncapped token crowdsales as we are able to provide an 
estimate on how big investment we need to achieve our business goal. Furthermore, 
uncapped token crowdsales turned out to be harmful for the tokenized economy as 
they are often driven by greed, taking advantage of the hype. For that, InsurePal token 
crowdsale will be processed automatically and a security measure for the contributors 
will be included. If the minimum goal is not reached, InsurePal will not be able to access 
the funds, and participating contributors will get a full refund. This measure adequately 
protects the contributors and eliminates the need for an escrow. At the same time, we 
are committed to deliver our features as comprehensively as possible, which is why we 
made InsurePal platform and its technical development a priority of our operations.

A total of up to 300 million of non-mineable IPL tokens will be issued during the IPL 
token crowdsale. Contributions will be made available in ETH (Ethereum) only. Each ETH 
contributed for the entire duration of the IPL Token Crowdsale will entitle the contribu-
tor to approx. 3,000 IPL tokens (the exact amount to be calculated and determined on 
16 January 2018, depending on the then value of ETH).
 

Role of token Utility

Token supply 300,000,000

Distributed in the crowvdsale 201,000,000 IPL (67 %)

Symbol/Ticker IPL

Decimals 18

Initial value $0.10

Blockchain Ethereum



Distributed social proof insurance39

The ETH/USD exchange rate will be locked based on the market exchange rate as of 16 
January 2018, and shall remain valid for the entire time of the IPL Token Crowdsale. The 
process of token crowdsale will be open for 21 days with the intention to close it early.

IPL TOKEN DISTRIBUTION 

OUT OF UP TO 300 MILLION IPL TOKENS:

 » up to 201,000,000 IPL Tokens (67%) will be distributed to the contributors in the IPL Token 
Crowdsale; and

 » up to 72,000,000 IPL Tokens (24%) will be distributed to the Founders and Team;
 » up to 18,000,000 IPL Tokens (6%) will be distributed to the Advisors and Ambassadors; and
 » up to 9,000,000 IPL Tokens (3%) are intended for Incentives for Users & Contributors of 

InsurePal platform.

The smart contract will generate IPL tokens immediately upon receiving ETH at its 
address. In due time, after the token crowdsale reaches its hard cap or closes after 21 
days, whichever occurs first, the IPL tokens will be released to the contributors and to 
InsurePal AG, according to the split outlined above. Each ETH contributed will generate 
a corresponding number of IPL Tokens (approx. 2,600 IPL Tokens for the contributor, 
plus potential bonuses and a corresponding amount of IPL Tokens to be distributed to 
InsurePal Ltd).
 

A 10% BONUS WILL BE ALLOCATED TO:

 » contributors who contribute within 96 hours of the InsurePal token crowdsale launch; or
 » contributors who contribute over 50 ETH.

Please note: each contributor cannot receive a bonus in excess of 10% (even if they 
contribute within 96 hours of the IPL Token Crowdsale launch with more than 50 ETH). No 
other bonus of any kind or nature will be offered subsequently.

* The token distribution as stated 
above is a simplification and 
it does not mean that natural 
persons are getting this tokens.
Some tokens will be distributed 
to natural persons and some 
tokens to other legal entities if 
legal entities are entering the 
InsurePal project.



Distributed social proof insurance40

InsurePal AG however reserves the right to introduce an IPL Token Pre-Crowdsale 
contribution period (by invitation only), where the bonus or a discount for the exclusive 
duration of the IPL Token Pre-Crowdsale contribution period may be up to 15% (at the 
discretion of InsurePal AG). IPL Tokens, based on the funds raised during the IPL Token 
Pre-Crowdsale contribution period, will be generated and distributed several hours prior 
to the start of the official IPL Token Crowdsale. The IPL Tokens distributed during the To-
ken Pre-Crowdsale contribution period will not exceed 70% of all the available IPL Tokens 
assigned to the contributors (with other words, during the IPL Token Pre-Crowdsale not 
more than 140.700.000 IPL tokens out of 201.000.000 IPL tokens will be distributed). 
All the investors in the Pre-Crowdsale will be whitelisted. 
 
In case the IPL Token Crowdsale is not successful (i.e. in case less than equivalent of $5 
million is contributed), all contributed funds will be returned to the contributors.
 
The ownership of the IPL token does not include the right to:
 » ownership of the company
 » ownership of the company’s intellectual property
 » ownership of the service’s IP
 » profits of the service
 » participate in decision making, unless options are put up on voting to token holders

 
The InsurePal founding team has a complete control over the strategy as well as a day-
to-day decision making. The InsurePal AG owns all intellectual property of the service, 
which includes:
 » InsurePal brand name and domain
 » InsurePal patent
 » InsurePal source code of the website
 » InsurePal platform algorithm
 » database(s)



Distributed social proof insurance41

MILESTONES

The funds raised by IPL crowdfunding will be distributed in the following manner: 

Phase 1  -  $5 million

InsurePal platform:  
- Platform core blockchain integration (Ethereum)
- Social proof endorsement scheme 
- Modules 1&2: social-proof for blockchain business transactions and for motor car insurance
- Light insurance core integration usage
- Worldwide patent filing completion and worldwide patent protection

Phase 2  -  $10 million

InsurePal platform:
-Additional modules: property, casualty,  life, health
-Full insurance core integration and usage within the system 
-Integration of other, third parties Payment/Fee structure

Phase 3  -  $18 million

UK motor car insurance pilot & development:
-MGA insurance licence
-Outsourced claims
-PR & Marketing Campaign
-Legal & Compliances
-Celebrity Endorsement
-Team cost

EU:
-EU motor car  passport license

ERP system implementation and integration

Global: 
-PR & Marketing Campaign(s)
-Legal & Compliance

*If the goal is not reached, the funds are returned. 



Team



Distributed social proof insurance43

TEAM

EXECUTIVE MANAGING TEAM

Matt Peterman
Co-founder & InsurePal CEO

Has been in insurance business and venture capital for over 15 years, working as an 
executive and business developer for insurance fraud detection company Salviol Ltd 
for the last three years. With his help, the company acquired several blue chip insur-
ance clients with a leading position in France and Portugal. Before, he worked with 
different private equity companies investing and helping them grow. He has made 
several successful in exits, including one IPO.

Thomas B. Manson
Chief Insurance Officer

A financial services and investment professional and a prominent member of the 
Lloyd’s Syndicate with over 20 years of experience in Eastern Europe and the former 
Soviet Union. He is a renowned public speaker and a lecturer on advising on strategy 
and business tactics.

Adam Parker
Chief Marketing Officer (CMO)

A passionate brand-builder, innovator, and commercial leader with a track record 
of accelerated growth on consumer-goods businesses. At Procter & Gamble, he led 
startup and billion-dollar brands in the UK and internationally. 

Tom Volk
Co-founder

Tom is a leader, an experienced director and a cosmopolitan who actively speaks 
5 languages with an educational background in physics, from which he received 
several awards. He has founded and is currently co-managing Adacta Group. Under 
his leadership, the company bootstrapped €25 million annual revenue and grown a 
network of more than 450 professionals in 7 different countries whilst developing a 
proprietary insurance core system widely used by European and Russian insurances.

FOUNDERS

Alexander Solomonov
Business Development Russia

An experienced IT & financial services professional and a renowned public speaker, 
deeply involved in developing and promoting new IT solutions and other know-hows 
to financial industry, mainly oriented to insurance sector. 

https://www.linkedin.com/in/matjaz-matt-peterman-933666/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/tom-manson-aa14611/?locale=de_DE
https://www.linkedin.com/in/adamjoeparker
https://www.linkedin.com/in/toma%C5%BE-volk-90a3801/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/alexander-solomonov-49128175/


Distributed social proof insurance44

Robert Kovacic
Chief Compliance Officer

An experienced tax advisor, exercising sound judgement and risk managing with 
more than a decade of working experience. Specialized in corporate and personal 
income tax, cross border taxation and transactional taxation. 

Daniel Bieusz
General Legal Counsel

Practicing law in Zurich, with extensive experiences with FINMA and FNM (Swiss and 
Liechtenstein financial market supervisors). In last two years he has been actively 
involved in blockchain as a legal advisor.

Maxim Streltses
Chief Financial Officer

Previously worked with Pairstech, Oppenheimer and UBS in advising high-net-worth 
institutional clients and managing portfolios. A dedicated professional with strong 
track record in investment and financial risk management.  

https://www.linkedin.com/in/robert-kovacic-24895541/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/biesuz/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/max-streltses-53955565/


Distributed social proof insurance45

Charlie Shrem
Business Development
Advisor

A Bitcoin pioneer. A social economist 
and digital currency trader. His work 
in this field is legendary. In 2011, at 
the dawn of the crypto era, he found-
ed BitInstant, the first and largest 
Bitcoin company. In 2013, he founded 
the Bitcoin Foundation and serve as 
its Vice Chairman. In short, he is the 
ultimate insider at the epicenter of 
the cypto universe. 

Peter M. Moricz
Strategy Advisor & Connector
for the Blockchain Economy

Strategy advisor in the blockchain and 
regtech sector, conuseling numerous 
successful ICOs, including Viberate. 
With a background in compliance and 
risk management, Peter has over 20 
years of comprehensive experience 
in derivative trading and investment 
strategies.

Corey Cohen
Marketing Specialist

Experienced co-founder/operator of 
ADjector LLP with a demonstrated 
history of working in the online media 
industry. Strong entrepreneurship 
professional skilled in SEO, Customer 
Acquisition, E-commerce, Digital Mar-
keting and Data monetization.

Tomislav Mučič
Senion Blockchain Consultant

A pioneer in blockchain with decades 
of experience in IT security and 
Project Development. As a true 
blockchain advocate he focuses on 
the architectural design and imple-
mentation of global protocols that will 
lay the grounding foundation for the 
future of business. 

Euan King
Senior Insurance Expert

Former CEO of 1insure, a $200M 
global provider of software-led 
solutions to insurers for policy 
management, claims management 
and analytics (owned by The Carlyle 
Group). Prior to this, he was instru-
mental in the successful expansion 
of Innovation Group (FTSE:TIG) to the 
US market.

ADVISORS

Andrej Plankar
Blockchain Business 
Consultant

A prolific entrepreneur and a 
blockchain evangelist, dedicated 
to cryptocurrency and technology 
innovation. Sees blockchain as the 
new digital alphabet that will rock 
the business world.

Damian Arnold
Insurance & Operations Expert

Previous COO of Direct Line 
(LON:DLG), in which time he oversaw 
the €550 million sale to Mapfre SA 
(BME: MAP) Overall he has 17 years’ 
track record of transforming business 
performance and enhancing value 
in both, insurance and technology 
sectors.

Matjaz Rakovec
Chief Operation Officer (COO)

Has more than 20 years of experi-
ence in the insurance industry, most 
recently as the CEO of Triglav,  Adri-
atic region’s largest insurance group 
with €1 billion net written premiums. 
He has been awarded the accolade 
of Financial Manager of the year in 
2012 and 2013 and is currently the 
president of  Slovene Ice Hockey 
Association.

https://www.linkedin.com/in/charlieshrem/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/petermmoricz/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/corey-cohen-29600a3/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/tomislav-mu%C4%8Di%C4%8D-8486a7/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/euan-king-51a296/
: https://www.linkedin.com/in/andrej-plankar-b2813773/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/damian-arnold-09b89047/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/matja%C5%BE-rakovec-16905b3/


Distributed social proof insurance46

Tomaz Furlan
Blockchain and Crowdsale 
Project Manager

A rare example of an expert 
successfully translating ICT into a 
business language. He is a visionary 
with entrepreneurial mindset and an 
outstanding knowledge in the fields 
of project management, planning and 
management.

Tanja Bivic
Communications & PR
Consultant

Tanja has years of experience in com-
munications management, working as 
editor-in-chief of Slovenia`s national 
TV. She`s providing strategic counsel 
and leadership to key stakeholders, 
directing them to relevant messaging 
and positioning within the crypto 
community. Holds a social work 
degree.

BLOCKCHAIN TEAM

COMMUNICATIONS

NETIS GROUP

Melita Gulja
Communications Specialist & 
Content Creator

A digital native with years of agency 
experience in public relations and 
content communications projects. 
She is excellent in developing and 
executing corporate strategy whilst 
manage messaging to help building 
and supporting company’s unique 
voice and reputation. 

Igor Zgonc
Blockchain Business
Consultant

Igor is a result-driven professional 
with an exceptional entrepreneur-
ial spirit and in-dept knowledge of 
blockchain and crypto market. His 
company Silver Bullet Risk is devel-
oping innovative risk management 
solutions and consulting corporations 
in ways to achieve higher goals whilst 
reducing costs. 

Matjaz  Šircelj
Community Manager

A communicator, digital PR and social 
media strategist, consultant and 
public speaker with two decades of 
experience in tech companies and 
advertising agencies. As a freelancer 
he is consulting international brands, 
organizing conferences and local 
entrepreneurial events. 

Sebastjan Pirih
Digital Marketing Consultant

With a strong focus, strategic mindset 
and a creative talent he is outstand-
ing in developing out-of-the-box digi-
tal approaches in the fields of content 
marketing, social media and creative 
digital communications.

Rok Kunej
Communications and Marketing 
Specialist 

Rok is a skilled wordsmith, disrupting 
digital communications in various 
roles for more than 10 years. His 
deep understanding of digital chan-
nels makes his messages delivered 
in time and in line with the user’s 
expectations.

https://www.linkedin.com/in/toma%C5%BE-furlan-2b3849b/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/crypto-tanya-6928a2144/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/melitagulja/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/igor-zgonc-4016b1/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/matjazsircelj/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/sebastjanpirih/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/kunej/


Distributed social proof insurance47

Jernej Srebrnic
Lead Blockchain & Software Architect

Jernej is a software engineer, architect and developer 
with more than 15 years of experience and a BSc 
degree. He is a master of Java SE & EE, lately focused on 
exploring blockchain technologies.

Tomaz Vodisek
Full-stack Lead Developer

A full-stack Java developer with over a decade of 
experience in developing business critical solutions in 
the fields of telecommunications and healthcare. Block-
chain and dApps development are next milestones in 
his professional career. 

DEVELOPMENT

Spela Novsak
Full-stack developer

Špela is full stack developer, capable of developing 
complex business logic and back end code, but with a 
great affinity for front end development as well. Špela 
holds a BSc degree from the Faculty of Informatics and 
Computer science of the University of Ljubljana.  When 
she is not coding she teach kids ballet. 

Larissa Bobkova Lagudin
UX and web developer

Besides having a vast experience in programming and 
planning of digital systems, websites information archi-
tecture and applications, Larissa is an expert in digital 
marketing, consulting on planning, design, and imple-
mentation of digital solutions and training of users.

Grega Stritar
Software Developer, CEO at NeoLab

A software architect, entrepreneur and a blogger with 
a masters in information sciences. He is the CEO of a 
software studio Neolab, developing custom business 
solutions and business intelligence projects for various 
clients.

Blaz Blokar
Blockchain developer 

Young and promising developer, extremely passionate 
about blockchain and crypto related technologies. He 
is blockchain and Lynux sys admin, capable of handling 
challenging setup, configuration and system mainte-
nance of key components on the chain.

Sebastjan Dimnik
Project management  & UX 

Sebastjan is an energetic and motivated professional 
with experience in UX, business digitalization and 
project management. He is a result-driven team-player, 
building collaborative relationships whilst demonstrat-
ing responsible leadership.

Support team:
Besides the listed team members the project is backed up by a strong and unified team 
of business analysts, PM’s and developers, all together counting more than 20 individu-
als. 

https://www.linkedin.com/in/jernej-srebrni%C4%8D-4bb99b3/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/tomaz-vodisek-a93a9988/
http://www.linkedin.com/in/špela-novšak-b9203679/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/larissab/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/stritar/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/bla%C5%BE-blokar-71a2a612b/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/sebastjand/


Distributed social proof insurance48

RISKS AND DISCLAIMERS

This Whitepaper has been prepared by InsurePal for the sole purpose of assisting prospective partici-
pants in deciding whether to participate in the InsurePal token. We emphasize that this is an open-source 
initiative where everyone makes the decision independently.

We further note, that financial information contained in the Whitepaper and accompanying materials is 
unaudited. The projections contained herein and the accompanying materials are based on certain as-
sumptions. No assurance can be given that these assumptions will prove to be correct, and, accordingly, 
no assurance can be given that actual results will conform to the projected results.
InsurePal, the management and the development teams of the project, expressly disclaim any responsi-
bility for ensuring the accuracy or completeness of the information contained herein and in the accom-
panying materials. Accordingly, neither of us, nor any other individuals or entity, nor any of our affiliates, 
representatives or advisors will be subject to any liability for any inaccuracies in or any omissions from 
materials contained herein or the accompanying materials or any other oral or written information pro-
vided with respect to the InsurePal token and no express or implied representations or warranties will be 
deemed to have been made with respect to the Whitepaper or any other matters.

Neither the project management and core development teams, nor InsurePal AG, nor any affiliates, rep-
resentatives or advisors are under any obligation to update, supplement or correct this Whitepaper or 
accompanying materials in any respect, or otherwise to provide any recipient or reviewer of these materi-
als with access to any additional information. In addition, the project management and core development 
teams, InsurePal and the development teams reserve the right, without prior notice to any reviewer or 
recipient of this Whitepaper or any accompanying materials, to terminate, at any time, further participa-
tion until tokens are generated, we reserve the right to modify any applicable procedures, without giving 
advance notice thereof and without providing any reason therefor.

We emphasize in the strongest possible terms that a InsurePal token does not represent own-
ership or a security interest in InsurePal or any other entity. Nor is a InsurePal token related to 
any other assets or properties. The token does not represent a debt owed by the Foundation 
or any other entity, and shall not be considered a debenture. If you determine that InsurePal 
tokens may constitute a security subject to regulations in any country, we strongly advise you 
not to acquire them and suggest you immediately notify us of any possible risks. In addition, 
we feel compelled to advise you of the following risks, and indicate that these and additional 
risk need to be factored in your decision.

TOKEN VALUE RISKS

Due to the very short history of crypto tokens and crypto-economic systems, there are several challenges 
that token holders face when trying to value these projects and underlying tokens.

The short history of crypto tokens has generally shown an even shorter lifespan of many of the projects. 
This is especially true because projects present a big principal-agent problem. This is different than a 
startup that usually raises money in a series of different rounds over several years.

Second, there is some level of systemic risk associated with the crypto markets that cannot really be di-
versified away. The industry is too nascent for that. Therefore token-holders take on both project-specific 
risk and market risk when they acquire tokens in a specific sector

The systemic risk is very hard to predict, due to the short time span, and is unique to the industry. Ev-
erything from hard forks to new crypto attacks are a source of systemic risk that traditional investments 
don’t suffer from.

Many projects are interdependent, which causes dependency risk to projects. For example, a crypto proj-
ect built on ethereum will be affected by things happening in ethereum, like a bug found in a compiler, or 
an attack on the ethereum network.



Distributed social proof insurance49

And further, as layers of the ecosystem build up, this dependency risk deepens.

REGULATORY RISKS

Generally, as the development of blockchain tokens continues to enable new business models, new legal 
issues come into focus. For developers, legal and regulatory uncertainty can be one of the main barriers 
to building new blockchain protocols and applications.

We emphasize in the strongest possible way that InsurePal tokens do not represent ownership or a se-
curity interest over any entity or assets or property. They do not represent a debt owed by any entity and 
shall not be considered a debenture under any applicable law. It is for these reasons that we believe that 
our tokens are not securities and may be purchased by anyone.

If you determine that our tokens may constitute securities subject to regulation in any country, we strong-
ly advise you from acquiring them and suggest you immediately notify us of the possible risks.




